New York, session 2025-2026, S10080.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 301 of the financial services law is amended by 2 adding two new subsections (d) and (e) to read as follows: 3 (d) The superintendent shall be required to conduct a review of 4 mandated benefits required by New York state law in effect as of Decem- 5 ber thirty-first, two thousand twenty-five and issue a report detailing 6 both the individual and cumulative costs of such mandates on insurance 7 premiums. Such report shall be due one year from the date on which this 8 subsection takes effect. 9 (e) The superintendent shall be required to conduct a cost analysis of 10 legislation mandating new insurance benefits to examine the impact on 11 insurance premiums prior to the adoption of such legislation. New legis- 12 lation passed but not yet considered by the governor shall not be deemed 13 in full force and effect until such cost analysis from the superinten- 14 dent is completed and made publicly available for review and comment. 15 The provisions of this subsection shall apply to all legislation passed 16 on or after the date which this subsection takes effect. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11944-03-6